Illinois, session 104th, HB4272.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)7    Sec. 2MMMM. Gas appliance labeling.8    (a) No person shall sell, attempt to sell, or offer to sell 9to a consumer in this State a non-externally vented natural 10gas appliance that is manufactured on or after January 1, 2027 11unless a label on the gas appliance bears the message:12        WARNING: Gas appliances can release nitrogen dioxide 13    and carbon monoxide inside homes at levels exceeding the 14    Environmental Protection Agency's standards for outdoor 15    air quality. The presence of these pollutants may 16    exacerbate pre-existing respiratory illnesses or lead to 17    the development of asthma, especially in children. Gas 18    appliances should never be used without a ducted vent hood 19    to reduce exposure to these emissions.20    (b) The label required under subsection (a) shall be 21attached to the gas appliance in a conspicuous location. The 22label must be in a type size no smaller than the largest type 23size used for other consumer information on the product.  HB4272- 2 -LRB104 17273 SPS 30695 b1    (c) The Attorney General may adopt rules setting forth 2additional requirements for the placement and formatting of 3the label required under subsection (a).4    (d) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 5practice within the meaning of this Act.